District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Reservoir District Tax Exemption Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 46 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“§ 47-4682. Tax Exemption for Reservoir District; Lots 809, 810, 814, 815, Square
3128.”
(b) A new section 47-4682 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-4682. Tax Exemption for Reservoir District; Lots 809, 810, 814, 815, Square 3128.
“(a) For the purpose of this section, the term:
“(1) “Owner” means McMillan Parcel 2 Owner, LLC, and McMillan Parcel 4
Owner, LLC, affiliates of LDP Holdings, LLC d/b/a Jair Lynch Real Estate Partners, its
successors, affiliates, and assigns.

“(2) “Property” means the real property, including any improvements constructed
thereon, at Parcel 2 West and Parcel 4 within the Reservoir District; known for tax and
assessment purposes as Lots 814 and 815 in Square 3128, and Lots 809 and 810 in Square 3128,
respectively.
“(b) Beginning on October 1, 2029, 100% real property tax imposed on the Property
pursuant to Chapter 8 of this title shall be exempted for 20 real property tax years; provided, that
the Owner shall:
“(1) Operate or cause to be operated 449 units of housing at the Property;
“(2) Set aside 1/3 of the operating rental housing units in the Property as
affordable and available for households earning an average of 80% Area Median Income;
“(3) Enter into an agreement with the District government that requires the
Owner, or its designee or assignee, to, at a minimum, contract with certified business enterprises
for at least 35% of the contract dollar volume of the construction of the project, in accordance
with Subchapter IX-A of Chapter 2 of Title 2; and
“(4) By September 30 of the year immediately preceding each tax year in the
exemption period set forth in this subsection, provide the Mayor with information showing what
percentage each of the requirements for eligibility for the exemption provided by this section has
been met. If the total number of units of housing per subsections (b)(1) and (b)(2) has not been
met the percentage of the real property tax exemption shall be reduced in equal proportion to the
percentage of units of housing that are not currently operating in the given real property tax year.
“(c) By December 31 of each tax year of the exemption period provided in subsection (b)
of this section, the Mayor shall certify to the Office of Tax and Revenue what percentage of tax
exemption the Property is eligible for the exemption provided in this section for that tax year.

The Mayor shall notify the Office of Tax and Revenue if the Property ceases to be eligible for
the exemption and the date such eligibility ceased.
“(d) The exemptions provided by this section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of,
any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to the Owner and/or Property.”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.